Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska73-103
Fair labor standards; low bidder; disqualification.

A showing in a public hearing by interested parties, to the satisfaction of the awarding authority, that any contractor bidding upon public works, and having filed the statement as required by section 73-102, has not complied with fair labor standards in the pursuit of his business or occupation, shall be the basis for the disqualification of the low bid, in which case the awarding authority shall let the bid to the next lowest responsible bidder.

Laws 1939, c. 55, § 2, p. 227;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 73-103;

R.S.1943, § 73-103.

Lowest money bid may not always constitute lowest responsible bid. Day v. City of Beatrice, 169 Neb. 858, 101 N.W.2d 481 (1960).